Maine, session 132, LD1639.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4801-A is enacted to read:
§4801-A. Minimum instructional hours
1. Minimum instructional hours. A school administrative unit shall ensure that each
school within the unit provides at least 900 instructional hours per school year.
For purposes of this section, "instructional hours" means hours during the school day during
which students are engaged in regularly scheduled instruction, educational activities or
academic programs under the supervision of school staff. Instructional hours do not include
extracurricular activities, lunchtime or recess. Time spent on an organized field trip related
to academic programs may be considered instructional hours, but the instructional hours
counted for a field trip may not exceed a regular school day for each day of the field trip.
Instructional hours include educational activities provided outside of the regular school day
to a student enrolled in a program described in section 4703 or any other academic program
outlined in a school administrative unit's comprehensive education plan under section 4502.
2. Waivers. The commissioner may grant a waiver to a school administrative unit for
a school to be exempted from the minimum instructional hours requirement under
subsection 1 for extraordinary circumstances, including but not limited to natural disasters,
public health emergencies and other unforeseen events that significantly disrupt school
operations. A school administrative unit requesting a waiver under this subsection must
submit a written application to the department that details the circumstances and a proposed
plan to address the loss of instructional hours.
3. Compliance and reporting. A school administrative unit shall submit an annual
report to the department certifying that the school administrative unit is in compliance with
the requirements of this section. The department shall monitor compliance and may take
corrective action, including withholding state subsidies, for noncompliance.
4. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to all school administrative units in the State
beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.